Missouri, session 2026, HB2890.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 259.220, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 259.220, to read as follows:
259.220. [All rights and interests in or to oil, gas or other minerals underlying land,
whether created by or arising under deed, lease, reservation of rights, or otherwise, which
rights or interests are owned by any person other than the owner of the land, shall be assessed
and taxed separately to the owner of such rights or interests in the same manner as other real
estate. The taxes on such rights or interests which are not owned by the owner of the land
shall not be a lien on the land.] All rights and interests in, or related to, oil, gas, or other
minerals beneath land within this state, whether federal, state, or county land,
established by deed, lease, reservation of rights, or any other means and owned by any
individual or entity other than the landowner shall be assessed and taxed separately to
the holder of such rights and interests in the same manner as other real estate. Taxes
levied on these separate mineral rights and interests, when not held by the landowner,
shall not constitute a lien.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.